Utah statutes.
10-2-108.   Public hearings on feasibility study results -- Notice of hearings.

(1)  If the results of the feasibility study or supplemental feasibility study meet the requirements of Subsection 10-2-109(3), the county legislative body shall, at its next regular meeting after receipt of the results of the feasibility study or supplemental feasibility study, schedule at least two public hearings to be held:

(a)  within the following 60 days;

(b)  at least seven days apart;

(c)  in geographically diverse locations within the proposed city; and

(d)  for the purpose of allowing:

(i)  the feasibility consultant to present the results of the study; and

(ii)  the public to become informed about the feasibility study results and to ask questions about those results of the feasibility consultant.

(2) (a) (i)  The county clerk shall publish notice of the public hearings required under Subsection (1):

(A)  at least once a week for three successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation within the proposed city; and

(B)  on the Utah Public Notice Website created in Section 63F-1-701, for three weeks.

(ii)  The last publication of notice required under Subsection (2)(a)(i)(A) shall be at least three days before the first public hearing required under Subsection (1).

(b) (i)  If, under Subsection (2)(a)(i)(A), there is no newspaper of general circulation within the proposed city, the county clerk shall post at least one notice of the hearings per 1,000 population in conspicuous places within the proposed city that are most likely to give notice of the hearings to the residents of the proposed city.

(ii)  The clerk shall post the notices under Subsection (2)(b)(i) at least seven days before the first hearing under Subsection (1).

(c)  The notice under Subsections (2)(a) and (b) shall include the feasibility study summary under Subsection 10-2-106(3)(b) and shall indicate that a full copy of the study is available for inspection and copying at the office of the county clerk.

